Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Bail: effect on liability of bail bond surety of state's delay in obtaining indictment or bringing defendant to trial, 32 ALR4th 600.

Age group underrepresentation in grand jury or petit jury venire, 62 ALR4th 859.

Propriety of blanket or per se rule prohibiting federal grand jury from indicting witness who has previously testified before same grand jury under grant of use immunity, 139 ALR Fed 489.

§ 7-5-101.
Required court order for summoning.

A grand jury shall be summoned only when ordered by a judge of the district court.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 114, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5278; C.S. 1910, § 6142; C.S. 1920, § 7439; R.S. 1931, § 61-103; C.S. 1945, § 12-201; W.S. 1957, § 7-92; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Section constitutional. —

Statute providing that all crimes, misdemeanors and offenses may be prosecuted either by indictment or information and that no grand jury shall “hereafter” be summoned unless ordered by the court does not disparage any substantial right or constitutional guaranty, and is not ex post facto. (decided under prior law). In re Wright, 3 Wyo. 478, 27 P. 565,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1891).

Former provisions for grand jury were continued in force for pending cases

when this section was originally enacted. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Applied

in

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 7-5-102.
Manner of summoning; term.

A grand jury shall be selected, summoned and impaneled in the same manner as trial juries in civil actions and shall serve for one (1) year following selection unless discharged sooner by the district judge.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 35; R.S. 1899, § 3374; C.S. 1910, § 6140; C.S. 1920, § 7437; R.S. 1931, § 61-101; C.S. 1945, § 12-136; W.S. 1957, § 7-93; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications, selection and empaneling of trial juries, see §

1-11-101

et seq.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “shall be selected” for “shall be drawn.”

Formal finding of necessity not necessary. —

A formal finding of necessity by the district court (i.e., a statement of facts or the citing of this section) is not necessary to impanel a grand jury. Where the district court states that the grand jury is necessary, that is sufficient. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1987 revision).

Challenge to array. —

The only mode by which objections are available against the body of persons summoned to serve as grand jurors is by challenge to the array. Cook v. Territory, 3 Wyo. 110, 4 P. 887,

1884 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1884).

By pleading guilty, defendant forfeited right to challenge conviction

by claiming that the grand jury was convened and conducted improperly. Sword v. State, 746 P.2d 423,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 537

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 7-5-103.
Composition; qualifications; alternates.

A grand jury shall consist of twelve (12) persons who shall possess the qualifications of trial jurors as provided by W.S.

1-11-101

.

The district judge may direct the selection of one (1) or more alternate jurors who shall sit as regular jurors before an indictment is found. If a member of the grand jury becomes unable or disqualified to perform his duty he shall be replaced by an alternate juror.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 114, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 5279; C.S. 1910, § 6143; C.S. 1920, § 7440; R.S. 1931, § 61-104; C.S. 1945, § 12-202; W.S. 1957, § 7-94; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

For constitutional requirement as to number of persons on grand jury, see art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.

Cited

in

In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1895).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusion of women as violation of constitutional rights of accused or as ground for reversal of conviction, 9 ALR2d 661.

Exclusion of attorneys from jury list in criminal cases, 32 ALR2d 890.

Police officers or other law enforcement officers as grand jurors, 72 ALR3d 895, 72 ALR3d 958.

Standing of criminal defendant to challenge, on constitutional grounds, discriminatory composition of federal jury where defendant is not member of class allegedly excluded, 68 ALR Fed 175.

§ 7-5-104.
Finding of indictment.

No indictment shall be found unless the finding is concurred in by at least nine (9) members of the grand jury.

Not less than nine (9) jurors may act as the grand jury in which event it is required that all of them concur in finding an indictment.

If an indictment is found as provided by this section the foreman of the grand jury shall endorse upon the indictment the words “A True Bill” and shall sign the indictment.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 114, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 5280; C.S. 1910, § 6144; C.S. 1920, § 7441; R.S. 1931, § 61-105; C.S. 1945, § 12-203; W.S. 1957, § 7-97; W.S. 1977, § 7-5-106; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to presentation and filing of indictment, see §

7-5-209

.

As to impermissibility of habeas corpus to question correctness of grand jury in finding bill of indictment, see §

1-27-125

.

As to indictments and information, see Rule 9, W.R. Cr. P.

Prosecution by information constitutional. —

Judgment cannot be attacked, as having been obtained without due process of law, because prosecution was by information instead of indictment. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 329, 40 P. 520,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1895).

Strict compliance with subsection (c) not necessary. —

An indictment was not required to be dismissed even though the foreman of the grand jury did not endorse the words “A True Bill” on the indictment (the words “A True Bill” were typed upon the indictment), as required by subsection (c). The indictment was returned in open court in the presence of all jurors; the foreman personally signed the verdict; and the words “A True Bill” were contained in each of the indictments. Strict compliance with subsection (c) was not necessary, as this state of facts resulted in a clear manifestation that the grand jury found probable cause. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).